Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,109
Net worth, defined.

Net worth shall mean the excess of total admitted assets over total liabilities. Liabilities shall not include fully subordinated debt.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 18.